lexicon/transformations/transducers/mixtec_plant_names/lexc/plant_names_segmental_alts.lexc
LEXICON Root
Loop ; 

LEXICON Loop
a Loop ;
b Loop ;
c  Loop ;
d  Loop ;
e  Loop ;
f  Loop ;
g  Loop ;
h  Loop ;
i  Loop ;
j  Loop ;
k  Loop ;
l  Loop ;
m  Loop ;
n  Loop ;

nd:nt Loop ;
nt:nd Loop ;

ñ  Loop ;
o  Loop ;
p  Loop ;
r  Loop ;

s:s  Loop ;
s:z  Loop ;

t  Loop ;
u  Loop ;
v  Loop ;
w  Loop ;
x  Loop ;
y  Loop ;

z:z  Loop ;
z:s  Loop ;

1  Loop ;
2  Loop ;
3  Loop ;
4  Loop ;
¹ Loop ;
² Loop ;
³ Loop ;
⁴ Loop ;
# ;
